California statutes. Water Code
(History: Added by renumbering Section 36500 by Stats. 1959, Ch. 614.)
-------------------------------------------

37202.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following terms used in this part shall mean:

(a) “Board of supervisors” means the board of supervisors of each county within which a district is located.

(b) “Bond” or “bonds” mean a general obligation bond or bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1301.)
-------------------------------------------

37203.

(a) On or before December 31st of any year the board may by resolution elect to proceed under this part for the levy, collection, and enforcement of any or all assessments, and thereafter until termination of that election the provisions of this part shall apply to the levy, collection, and enforcement of those assessments. The board by resolution may at any time on or before December 31st of any year terminate its election to proceed under this part, and thereafter the provisions of this part shall no longer apply to the levy, collection, and enforcement of those assessments. On or before January 1st following the adoption of either of those resolutions, a certified copy thereof shall be filed with the auditor, assessor, tax collector and treasurer of each county within which a district is located and with the State Board of Equalization. There shall also be filed with the county assessor and the State Board of Equalization a statement as required by Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 54900) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the board may, by resolution, elect at any time to proceed under this part only for the collection and enforcement of delinquent assessments, including standby and other charges, and thereafter until termination of that election this part shall apply to the collection and enforcement of the delinquent assessments. A certified copy of the resolution shall be filed with the auditor, assessor, tax collector, and treasurer of each county within which the district is located and the assessments shall thereafter be included in all county tax statements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1052, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

37203.1.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 54902 and 54903 of the Government Code and Section 37203, the Yolo-Zamora Water District may effectively proceed under this part for assessment and taxation purposes if a certified copy of the resolution of the board adopted pursuant to Section 37203 electing to proceed under this part, shall be filed with the Auditor, Assessor, Tax Collector and Treasurer of Yolo County and the State Board of Equalization on or before April 15, 1969, and a map or plat indicating the boundaries of the district shall be filed with the Yolo County Assessor and the State Board of Equalization on or before April 15, 1969.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 241.)
-------------------------------------------

37204.

The board may from time to time by resolution provide for a district fiscal year, to commence and end at the dates specified in said resolution.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 36504 by Stats. 1959, Ch. 614.)
-------------------------------------------

37205.

Whenever the fiscal year is changed, if necessary to provide sufficient money to meet the obligations and expenses of the district between the end of the previous fiscal year and the commencement of the new fiscal year, the board may add to the estimate to be furnished to the board of supervisors for the first new fiscal year an amount clearly sufficient to raise money for the purposes required or authorized by Section 37206.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 36505 by Stats. 1959, Ch. 614.)
-------------------------------------------

37206.

On or before August 1st the board of any district which has elected pursuant to Section 37203 to proceed under this part shall furnish to the county auditor and the board of supervisors an estimate in writing of the amount of money needed to be raised by assessment in the county for the payment of its proportion of the amount required for the purposes of the district for the next fiscal year. Except to the extent that provision has otherwise been made by the board, as may be permitted by law, for payment of the principal of and interest upon bonds as they become due and for payment of other claims and expenses of the district, said estimate shall be in an amount sufficient for payment of the county’s proportion of the principal of and interest on bonds as they become due and for payment of other claims and expenses of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

37207.

The board of supervisors annually at the time of levying county taxes shall levy an ad valorem assessment upon all lands within that portion of the district within the county sufficient to raise the amount stated in the estimate of the district board and shall levy an additional assessment against those lands upon which there are unpaid charges for water and other services as provided in Section 37212.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1211.)
-------------------------------------------

37207.1.

(a) This section applies only to the Santa Margarita Water District.

(b) If the board determines pursuant to Section 36424.1 to designate areas within an improvement district for which the Santa Margarita Water District has issued general obligation bonds, the board shall submit to the county auditor and the board of supervisors an estimate, in writing, of the amount of money required to be raised by assessment for the payment of the amount allocated by the board to each area for the payment of the principal of, and interest on, the bonds issued for the improvement district. Upon receiving the estimate, the board of supervisors shall levy an ad valorem assessment upon all lands within each designated area that is sufficient to raise the amount set forth in the estimate of the board.

(c) The district shall reimburse the county for any additional costs in carrying out the provisions of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 25, Sec. 2.   Effective May 24, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

37208.

Said ad valorem assessment shall be levied and collected at the same time and in the same manner and by the same officers and with the same penalties and interest as general county taxes and when collected shall be paid to the district.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 36508 by Stats. 1959, Ch. 614.)
-------------------------------------------

37209.

The board may by resolution authorize payment to the county of reasonable compensation, as may be provided by law or as may be agreed upon with the county, for services rendered by the county and the officers thereof in levying, collecting and enforcing district assessments pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 36509 by Stats. 1959, Ch. 614.)
-------------------------------------------

37210.

As used in this part, “assessment” includes “standby charges” and other charges levied for the use of district water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1052, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

37210.1.

In levying a standby charge, the board of any district which has elected, pursuant to Section 37203, to proceed under this part shall comply with the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 27, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

37210.2.

If the procedures set forth in this part as it read at the time a standby charge was established were followed, the board may, by resolution, continue the charge pursuant to this part in successive years at the same rate. If new, increased, or extended assessments are proposed, the board shall comply with the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 27, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

37211.

Notwithstanding Section 37207, the board of supervisors annually at the time of levying county taxes shall levy an ad valorem assessment upon all lands within that portion of the district within the county sufficient to raise the amount stated in the estimate of the district board; provided, however, that until such time as a district which has not theretofore delivered water for any purpose puts into operation facilities for the delivery of water, the board may levy a special assessment of an equal amount upon each acre of land within the district sufficient to defray all expenses as estimated by the board to be incurred for the general benefit of the district during the period in which facilities for the delivery of water primarily for agricultural purposes are being planned and constructed. In no event shall such equal amount assessment exceed three dollars ($3) per acre per year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 223.)
-------------------------------------------

37212.

In case any charges for water or other services, or either, remain unpaid:

(a) If unpaid for 60 days or more on July 1st, the district board may, by resolution, order the secretary to do each of the following:

(1) Prepare a list of the parcels of land upon which water and other services, or either, requested in writing by the owner of the property, was used, and for which the charges remain unpaid.

(2) Certify that the list is true and correct.

(3) Submit the list of unpaid charges and parcels to the county
 auditor no later than five days after the estimate of the district board was furnished pursuant to Section 37206.

Upon receipt by the county auditor of the list and a certified copy of the resolution, the amount of the unpaid charges attributed to each parcel mentioned in the list shall constitute a special assessment against the parcel, and shall be a lien on that property for that amount. The lien attaches upon recordation in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the property is situated of a certified copy of the resolution of the district board accompanied by a certified copy of the list specifically describing the real property by a legal description or reference to an assessor’s parcel number and specifying the amount applicable to each parcel. The assessment shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as ordinary municipal ad valorem taxes are collected, and shall be subject to the same penalties, and the same procedure and
 sale in case of delinquency as provided for those taxes. All laws applicable to the levy, collection, and enforcement of municipal ad valorem taxes shall be applicable to the assessment, except that, if any real property to which the lien would attach has been transferred or conveyed to a bona fide purchaser for value or a lien of a bona fide encumbrancer for value has been created and attached thereon during the year prior to the date on which the first installment of the taxes that include the assessment appears on the assessment roll, then the lien which would otherwise be imposed by this section shall not attach to the real property and the delinquent and unpaid charges, as certified, relating to the property shall be transferred to the unsecured roll for collection.

The county shall deduct from the charges collected an amount sufficient to compensate the county for costs incurred in collecting the delinquent and unpaid charges. The amount of this compensation
 shall be fixed by agreement between the board of supervisors and the district’s board of directors.

(b) The amount of the unpaid charges may, in the discretion of the district, be secured at any time by filing for record in the office of the county recorder of any county, a certificate specifying the amount of the charges and the name and address of the person liable therefor.

From the time of recordation of the certificate, the amount required to be paid together with interest and penalty constitutes a lien upon all real property in the county owned by the person or afterwards, and before the lien expires, acquired by him or her. The lien has the force, priority, and effect of a judgment lien and shall continue for 10 years from the date of the filing of the certificate unless sooner released or otherwise discharged. The lien may, within 10 years from the filing of the certificate or within 10 years
 from the date of the last extension of the lien in the manner herein provided, be extended by filing for record a new certificate in the office of the county recorder of any county and from the time of the filing the lien shall be extended to the real property in this county for 10 years unless sooner released or otherwise discharged.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 330, Sec. 24.   (SB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

37213.

A district which has elected pursuant to Section 37203 to proceed under this part shall notify the holder of title to land whenever delinquent and unpaid charges for water and other services or either which could become a lien on such property pursuant to Section 37212 remain delinquent and unpaid for 60 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1211.)
-------------------------------------------

37214.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part to the contrary, in the case of a sale of property for taxes or assessments, except where the sale is conducted and the funds are accounted for as provided in Division 1 (commencing with Section 101) of the Revenue and Taxation Code, all proceeds shall be accounted for and distributed as provided in Article 12 (commencing with Section 53925) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 648.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 8. CHANGES IN ORGANIZATION [37300. - 37580.]



  CHAPTER 1. Exclusion [37300. - 37300.]



  ARTICLE 1. Petition and Notice [37300. - 37300.]

37300.

One or more tracts of land may be excluded from the district under proceedings taken pursuant to the District Reorganization Act of 1965 (commencing at Section 56000, Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2043.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Inclusion [37485. - 37580.]



  ARTICLE 1. Petition and Notice [37485. - 37485.]

37485.

Land not a part of the district whether or not contiguous to it may be included within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Inclusion of Land Owned by the District [37580. - 37580.]

37580.

Upon the determination by the board that the inclusion within the district of any contiguous or noncontiguous land owned by the district is for the best interest of the district, the board may, by resolution, declare that the land is included within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 8.1. WESTLANDS WATER DISTRICT MERGER [37800. - 37861.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [37800. - 37806.]

37800.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Westlands Water District Merger Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

37801.

The state and the people thereof have a primary and supreme interest in securing to the inhabitants and property owners within and adjacent to the federal service area of the San Luis unit of the Central Valley project now under construction by the United States the greatest possible use and conservation of the waters to be made available from said unit and the greatest use thereof to the area, thereby assuring that the greatest productivity of the largest possible area may be accomplished and safely carried on within reasonable limits of economy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

37802.

Investigation having shown that conditions in and surrounding the federal service area of the San Luis unit of the Central Valley project are peculiar to that area, it is hereby declared that a general law cannot be made applicable thereto and that this part is therefore necessary for the proper distribution, use, and control of the natural supplies of water now available for said area and of the water to be made available from the San Luis unit of the Central Valley project, and for elimination of duplication of governmental authority, the securing of greater economy of administration, and the more efficient and effective utilization of ground water and imported water supplies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

37803.

The Westlands Water District, situated in Fresno and Kings Counties, was formed, prior to the enactment of this part, and is operating under this division, primarily for irrigation purposes.

The West Plains Water Storage District, situated in Fresno and Kings Counties, was formed, prior to the enactment of this part, and is operating under the California Water Storage District Law, primarily for irrigation purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

37804.

This part is enacted in part under the authority expressly granted in Section 13 of Article XI of the Constitution of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

37805.

This part shall be given a liberal construction for the purpose of sustaining any and all proceedings taken hereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

37806.

Nothing in this part shall impair or adversely affect any right of any bondholder or creditor of the water storage district or the California water district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. The Merger [37820. - 37826.]

37820.

The West Plains Water Storage District is, on the effective date of this section, hereby merged into the Westlands Water District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

37821.

The surviving district comprises all land in the water district immediately following the merger plus inclusion, and less exclusions, of land thereafter made pursuant to law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

37822.

The name of the surviving district is Westlands Water District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

37823.

The surviving district is a public agency of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

37824.

Upon the merger of the two districts, the water storage district for all purposes ceases to exist, and the offices of its directors and officers are terminated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

37825.

Upon the merger, the directors and officers of the California water district then in office constitute the directors and officers of the surviving district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

37826.

Upon the merger, the surviving district succeeds to all properties, rights, and contracts of each of the two districts and any funds to which it succeeds may be expended and properly disposed of as provided by law for California water districts generally.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Operation of Surviving District [37850. - 37856.]

37850.

Except as in this part expressly provided, the surviving district shall in all respects be operated, managed, and governed, its directors and officers shall be elected or appointed, and its revenues shall be raised and expended as provided by law for California water districts generally.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

37851.

All actions and proceedings pending by or against the water storage district at the time of the merger may be prosecuted to final judgment for or against the water storage district or the surviving district may be substituted as a party.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

37852.

After the merger, no action or proceeding shall be brought for or against the water storage district or its directors or officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

37853.

All actions and proceedings commenced after the merger, either on account of the affairs of the water storage district or affairs of the California water district, shall be prosecuted by or against the surviving district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

37854.

All outstanding bonded and other indebtedness of the water storage district and of the California water district at the time of the merger is hereby assumed by the surviving district, and all bondholders and creditors of the two districts may enforce their rights against the surviving district in like manner as might have been done against the water storage district or the California water district if the two districts had not been merged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

37855.

The board of directors and officers of the surviving district shall peform all duties and functions of the board of directors and corresponding officers of the water storage district relating to the assessment, levy, and collection of assessments with respect to assessments levied but uncollected as of the date of the merger in the same manner and at the same times as is provided in the California Water Storage District Law, and all county officers and boards of supervisors shall likewise perform their functions and duties with relation to the assessment, levy, and collection of such assessments as is provided in the California Water Storage District Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

37856.

Lands which were within the Westlands Water District immediately prior to the merger shall, so long as said lands remain in the said district, have a prior right with respect to water to which said district was entitled under any contract with the United States in effect on the date of said merger over (1) lands added to the Westlands Water District as a result of the merger and (2) lands annexed to the said district subsequent to the merger.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Additional Powers of the District [37860. - 37861.]

37860.

(a) For purposes of this section, “for its own purposes” means the Westlands Water District performing only functions within its capacity as a water district, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Pumping operations.

(2) Water treatment operations.

(3) Barrier intrusion operations.

(4) Desalination operations.

(b) (1) The Westlands Water District may provide, generate, and deliver solar photovoltaic electricity, and may construct, operate, and
 maintain any and all works, facilities, improvements, and property, or portions thereof, necessary or convenient for generating and delivering that electricity.

(2) An electric powerplant or transmission line constructed pursuant to this subdivision may be leased for operation.

(3) The electricity generated pursuant to this subdivision shall be used by the Westlands Water District for its own purposes. The district may sell surplus electricity to a public or private entity that is engaged in the distribution or sale of electricity.

(c) The Westlands Water District may construct, operate, and maintain an energy storage system, as defined in Section 2835 of the Public Utilities Code, and all works, facilities, improvements, and property, or portions thereof, necessary or convenient for the operation of an energy
 storage system, within the boundaries of the district, regardless of whether the energy storage system is interconnected to or directly charged by an electric powerplant constructed pursuant to subdivision (b). An energy storage system constructed pursuant to this subdivision may be leased for operation. The district may operate an energy storage system in a manner intended, as determined by the district, to increase the economic value of the energy storage system and the district is not required to use the discharging energy for its own purposes. The district may purchase discharging energy through a market administered by the Independent System Operator. The district may sell discharging energy and any attributes of the energy storage system through a market administered by the Independent System Operator.

(d) The Westlands Water District may construct, operate, and maintain electrical transmission lines and all works, facilities,
 improvements, and property, or portions thereof, necessary or convenient for the conveyance of electricity within the boundaries of the district, regardless of whether the transmission lines are used for the purpose of conveying electricity from an electric powerplant constructed pursuant to subdivision (b). Transmission lines constructed pursuant to this subdivision may be leased for operation. The district may sell the rights to use transmission lines constructed pursuant to this subdivision to any public or private entity that is engaged in the distribution or sale of electricity. Transmission facilities developed pursuant to this section shall be controlled by a California balancing authority, as defined in Section 399.12 of the Public Utilities Code, regardless of ownership by the Westlands Water District or a subsequent owner.

(e) This section does not authorize the Westlands Water District to provide, sell, or deliver electricity at
 retail.

(f) The Westlands Water District shall not acquire property employed in the generation or delivery of electricity for public or private utility purposes, except by mutual agreement between the district and the owner of that property.

(g) The Westlands Water District shall report the amount of income, and the purposes for expenditure of that income, from electricity facilities constructed pursuant to this section in the report required by Section 53892 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   (AB 2661)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

37861.

(a) The Westlands Water District shall establish a community benefits agreement plan for the Valley Clean Infrastructure Plan and related transmission and other electrical projects constructed pursuant to Section 37860.

(b) The community benefits agreement plan shall be designed to ensure that local communities have meaningful opportunities to participate and access benefits associated with projects that are part of the Valley Clean Infrastructure Plan.

(c) The community benefits agreement plan shall outline the specific benefits to be provided to local communities, which may include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Job creation and training programs for local residents.

(2) Use of local businesses and vendors.

(3) Financial contributions to community development projects and programs.

(d) For purposes of this section, “local communities” means counties, cities, and other local governmental agencies located within, or adjacent to, the Westlands Water District’s jurisdictional boundaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   (AB 2661)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 8.2. Paso Robles Basin Water District [37900. - 37969.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [37900. - 37904.]

37900.

(a) For purposes of this part, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Aquifer” means a geologic formation or structure that transmits water in sufficient quantities to supply pumping wells or springs.

(2) “Available supply” means that quantity of groundwater that can be withdrawn in any given year from a groundwater basin or aquifer without resulting in or aggravating conditions of overdraft, subsidence, or groundwater quality degradation. Available supply of a groundwater basin or aquifer includes the natural water supply, imported water, or other water that has been spread to a basin or aquifer or otherwise added to a basin or aquifer, and return flows to the basin or aquifer
 attributable to these sources reaching the groundwater basin or aquifers in the course of use.

(3) “Board” means the board of directors of the Paso Robles Basin Water District.

(4) “Conjunctive use” means the coordinated operation of a groundwater basin and groundwater and surface water supplies. Conjunctive use includes increased groundwater use or decreased groundwater replenishment with surface supplies in years when surface supplies are less than normal and, in years of more abundant surface supplies, the increased use of surface water in lieu of groundwater, either to allow groundwater levels to recover or to replenish artificial groundwater supplies. Conjunctive use also includes long-term storage of water in a groundwater basin.

(5) “County” means the County of San Luis Obispo.

(6) “District” means the Paso Robles Basin Water District, the boundaries of which shall be established and may be modified by the San Luis Obispo County Local Agency Formation Commission.

(7) “Excess extractions” means those extractions in excess of an operator’s extraction allocation or adjusted extraction allocation.

(8) “Extraction” means the act of obtaining groundwater by pumping or other controlled means.

(9) “Extraction allocation” means the amount of groundwater that may be extracted from an extraction facility during a calendar year before a surcharge is imposed.

(10) “Extraction surcharge” means a surcharge assessed annually each time an operator exceeds his or her extraction
 allocation.

(11) “Extraction facility” means any device or method for the extraction of groundwater within a groundwater basin or aquifer.

(12) “Groundwater” means water beneath the surface of the earth within the zone below the water table in which the soil is completely saturated with water.

(13) “Groundwater basin” means a geologically and hydrologically defined area containing one or more aquifers that store and transmit water yielding significant quantities of water to wells.

(14) “Groundwater management activities” means programs, measures, or actions taken to preserve, protect, and enhance groundwater resources within the territory of the district.

(15) “Groundwater rights
 adjudication” means the determination of substantially all rights in a groundwater basin or the area subject to the adjudication.

(16) “Operator” means a person who operates a groundwater extraction facility. In the event the district is unable to determine who operates a particular extraction facility, then “operator” shall mean the person to whom the extraction facility is assessed by the county assessor or, if not separately assessed, the person who owns the land upon which the extraction facility is located.

(17) “Overdraft” means the condition of the groundwater basin or aquifer where the average annual amount of water extracted exceeds the average annual supply of water to a basin or aquifer.

(18) “Program” means a groundwater management program prepared by the district pursuant to this act.

(19) “Recharge” means the natural or artificial replenishment of groundwater storage by percolation or injection of one or more sources of water at the surface.

(20) “Replenishment” means spreading water over a permeable area for the purpose of allowing it to percolate to groundwater basins or aquifers, or otherwise adding water to groundwater basins or aquifers.

(21) “Safe yield” means the condition of a groundwater basin when the total average annual groundwater extractions are equal to, or less than, the total average annual groundwater recharge, either naturally or artificially.

(22) “Supplemental water” means surface water or groundwater imported from outside the watershed or watersheds of the groundwater basin or aquifer and floodwaters that are
 conserved and saved within the watershed or watersheds that would otherwise have been lost or would not have reached the groundwater basin or aquifers.

(23) “Well interference” means a substantial water level decline in a short time period in a localized area caused by pumping from extraction facilities.

(b) This part shall apply only to the Paso Robles Basin Water District.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

37901.

The Legislature finds and declares that the provisions of this part are enacted in order to provide a governmental framework for the district to balance the supply to and consumption of groundwater within the basin underlying the district, and thereby pursue stabilizing that basin and sustaining its resources for the beneficial use of all who use water within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

37902.

The creation of the district is not intended to and shall not modify the powers of the County of San Luis Obispo and the San Luis Obispo County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, carried out consistent with applicable law, to manage and protect groundwater resources within the County of San Luis Obispo, including the Paso Robles Groundwater Basin.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

37903.

If formed, the district shall not involve itself in activities normally and historically undertaken by the county, the San Luis Obispo County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, or other local agency, without the agreement of the agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

37904.

If formed, the board shall provide by resolution the dates on which and the time and place at which regular meetings of the board shall be held. A copy of each resolution establishing the date, time, and place of a regular meeting shall be filed with the secretary of the board and the clerk, or secretary of the legislative body of each of the members. The board shall comply with the provisions of the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5).

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Formation [37905. - 37905.]

37905.

The formation process shall comply with the Cortese-Knox-Hertzberg Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000 (Division 3 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 5 of the Government Code), with the exception of the following provisions:

(a) On or before January 1, 2019, 10 percent of landowners may petition
 for, or an affected local agency within the county, including the county and the San Luis Obispo County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, may apply for by resolution, the formation of a district, consistent with the following definitions:

(1) “Landowner” means any person who holds title to land within the boundaries of the proposed district as shown on the last assessment roll prepared by the county assessor, or a legal representative of a landowner who holds title to land within the boundaries of the proposed district as shown on the last assessment roll prepared by the county assessor.

(2) “Landowner” does not include individuals, partnerships, corporations, or public agencies holding easements or less than fee interests, including leaseholds of any nature.

(3) “Legal representative” means either of the following:

(A) A duly appointed and acting guardian, executor, or administrator of the estate of a holder of title to land.

(B) One of the following:

(i) If the holder of title is a trust, any trustee of the trust may vote on behalf of the trust.

(ii) If the holder of title is a corporation, the president, vice president, secretary, or other duly designated officer may vote on behalf of the corporation.

(iii) If the holder of title is a limited liability company, any managing member may vote on behalf of the limited liability company.

(iv) An officer or partner with
 managerial responsibilities of a legal entity not listed in clauses (i) to (iii), inclusive, may vote on behalf of the entity.

(b) Following a successful petition by the landowners or a resolution of application by an affected local agency, an election among landowners shall be conducted on the matter of whether to form the district.

(c) For purposes of a petition to form the district and a vote on the matter to form the district, the following applies:

(1) Each voter, who shall be a landowner as defined in
 this section, may cast one vote on the matter of a petition and one vote on the matter of an election to form the district. Ownership of multiple parcels of land, in full or in part, shall not entitle any voter to more than one vote.

(2) For land held jointly, owners collectively get one vote. Nothing in this section should be construed to indicate that multiple owners of a property get more than one vote.

(3) In the event any landowner that is a member of the same commonly controlled group, as defined in Section 25105 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, or is a member of a combined reporting group, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 25106.5 of Title 18 of the California Code of Regulations, or under common ownership with, another landowner in the district, all members of the commonly controlled group or combined
 reporting group will be deemed a single landowner for the purpose of this subdivision.

(4) Each public agency that holds title to land within the district shall be entitled to one vote.

(5) No person shall vote by proxy unless his or her authority to cast that vote is evidenced by an instrument acknowledged and filed with the board of election.

(6) If from the election returns a majority of the votes cast at the election were in favor of the formation of the district, the formation of the district shall be complete.

(d) Recognizing that an election is needed to form the Paso Robles Basin Water District, the protest provisions of the Cortese-Knox-Hertzberg Reorganization Act of 2000 as they pertain to the formation of a district, do not
 apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Elections [37910. - 37913.]

37910.

Notwithstanding any other law or the bylaws of the district, all elections for the board of directors of the district shall be conducted in accordance with this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

37911.

The composition of the board of directors shall be as follows:

(a) There shall be a total of nine directors. A person may only be a candidate for one director.
